SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin uyghur.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4558 Y 1
SFX 4558 l maqqa l
SFX 1362 Y 1
SFX 1362 a ishingiz a
SFX 4116 Y 1
SFX 4116 a landi a
SFX 3422 Y 1
SFX 3422 d risi d
SFX 208 Y 1
SFX 208 i rp i
SFX 773 Y 1
SFX 773 a itishish a
SFX 1734 Y 1
SFX 1734 i ura i
SFX 4580 Y 1
SFX 4580 d lirimni d
SFX 2903 Y 1
SFX 2903 a ishidiken a
SFX 1210 Y 1
SFX 1210 p watqanlarning p
SFX 4679 Y 1
SFX 4679 p eleymen p
SFX 4543 Y 1
SFX 4543 r ndrshke r
SFX 4575 Y 1
SFX 4575 k liye k
SFX 3947 Y 1
SFX 3947 i etlerni i
SFX 3142 Y 1
SFX 3142 l mn l
SFX 1815 Y 1
SFX 1815 p ettim p
SFX 4767 Y 1
SFX 4767 i pe i
SFX 3930 Y 1
SFX 3930 e himizge e
SFX 1601 Y 1
SFX 1601 d shidin d
SFX 4579 Y 1
SFX 4579 s lirimni s
SFX 1053 Y 1
SFX 1053 a ishim a
SFX 3828 Y 1
SFX 3828 r nme r
SFX 3440 Y 1
SFX 3440 q nliqtin q
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 r shqandin r
SFX 1740 Y 1
SFX 1740 r shidin r
SFX 4035 Y 1
SFX 4035 y pe y
SFX 2704 Y 1
SFX 2704 t shidin t
SFX 539 Y 1
SFX 539 a ingizmu a
SFX 4605 Y 1
SFX 4605 q kin q
SFX 4846 Y 1
SFX 4846 s kin s
SFX 2941 Y 1
SFX 2941 t dliq t
SFX 796 Y 1
SFX 796 z kin z
SFX 1248 Y 1
SFX 1248 d shish d
SFX 3537 Y 1
SFX 3537 i genidi i
SFX 2670 Y 1
SFX 2670 k genidi k
SFX 2378 Y 1
SFX 2378 p genidi p
SFX 2840 Y 1
SFX 2840 d ring d
SFX 2027 Y 1
SFX 2027 i rgch i
SFX 698 Y 1
SFX 698 a usi a
SFX 1044 Y 1
SFX 1044 r shish r
SFX 3621 Y 1
SFX 3621 r qchi r
SFX 1132 Y 1
SFX 1132 t shish t
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 s qchi s
SFX 1732 Y 1
SFX 1732 i usi i
SFX 2089 Y 1
SFX 2089 l ptiken l
SFX 2832 Y 1
SFX 2832 z shish z
SFX 3882 Y 1
SFX 3882 r leymen r
SFX 2508 Y 1
SFX 2508 n ptiken n
SFX 999 Y 1
SFX 999 m ngde m
SFX 4256 Y 1
SFX 4256 m nlirimu m
SFX 3367 Y 1
SFX 3367 a eshtrlmek a
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 a ish a
SFX 3847 Y 1
SFX 3847 p ngde p
SFX 3046 Y 1
SFX 3046 d ish d
SFX 687 Y 1
SFX 687 y ptiken y
SFX 2884 Y 1
SFX 2884 k lerdin k
SFX 3018 Y 1
SFX 3018 q lushi q
SFX 592 Y 1
SFX 592 a iringni a
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 l ish l
SFX 3906 Y 1
SFX 3906 m ish m
SFX 3883 Y 1
SFX 3883 s lerdin s
SFX 2778 Y 1
SFX 2778 s ghi s
SFX 1149 Y 1
SFX 1149 o ish o
SFX 4812 Y 1
SFX 4812 q lmighachqa q
SFX 4130 Y 1
SFX 4130 t ish t
SFX 4769 Y 1
SFX 4769 q nsri q
SFX 4241 Y 1
SFX 4241 i releydighan i
SFX 3208 Y 1
SFX 3208 a eshtrlsh a
SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 i ungda i
SFX 3773 Y 1
SFX 3773 r zdiki r
SFX 3378 Y 1
SFX 3378 t didin t
SFX 2990 Y 1
SFX 2990 r nmey r
SFX 3911 Y 1
SFX 3911 a inidighanliqi a
SFX 2763 Y 1
SFX 2763 a ikmu a
SFX 3464 Y 1
SFX 3464 k llik k
SFX 2760 Y 1
SFX 2760 a imanglar a
SFX 3563 Y 1
SFX 3563 r zimu r
SFX 670 Y 1
SFX 670 e hmek e
SFX 4535 Y 1
SFX 4535 m ngizma m
